California, session 20252026, SB465.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 8585.3 is added to the Government Code, to read:8585.3. (a) (1) The office shall establish a statewide emergency alert system called California Alert.(2) California Alert shall utilize Wireless Emergency Alerts (WEA) authorized by the Integrated Public Alert & Warning System (IPAWS), the Federal Emergency Management Agency’s national system for local alerting that provides authenticated emergency information to the public through mobile phones within a designate cell tower’s coverage area.(3) The office shall contract with a private vendor that provide alerting systems to send California Alerts to registered phone numbers that are not location based.(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), primary responsibility for sending out emergency alerts to California residents shall lie with city-operated, county-operated, or city- and county-operated public emergency warning systems. California Alert operated by the office shall act as a backup to those alert systems and the office shall assist local government in sending out alerts, when requested to do so.(c) The office shall establish standards for issuing emergency alerts to California residents across local jurisdictional boundaries.SECTION 1.It is the intent of the Legislature to improve emergency alert systems to ensure that emergency alerts, notifications, and evacuation orders are delivered to their intended recipients in a timely, clear, and effective manner, while also preventing the dissemination of erroneous alerts.